Tennessee, session 114, SB0600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-150, is amended by adding
the following at the end of subdivision (j)(2):
The administrative office of the courts may distribute the form electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0600
001611
- 1 -